Illinois, session 104th, HB3965.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Minimum Wage Law is amended by changing 5Section 1 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 105/1)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1001)7    Sec. 1. This Act is known and and may be cited as the 8"Minimum Wage Law". 9(Source: P.A. 77-1451.)